Maryland, session 2025, HB1144.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
7–705.1.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) (I) “PUBLIC TRANSIT OPERATOR” HAS THE MEANING STATED
IN § 7–714 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(II) “PUBLIC TRANSIT OPERATOR” INCLUDES A PERSON
ENGAGED IN OFFICIAL DUTIES AS A STATION AGENT, CONDUCTOR, OR STATION
ATTENDANT WHO IS EMPLOYED BY:
1. AN ENTITY THAT PROVIDES TRANSIT SERVICE UNDER
CONTRACT WITH THE ADMINISTRATION;
– 1 –

Ch. 542 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
2. A PRIVATE ENTITY THAT PROVIDES PUBLIC TRANSIT
SERVICE; AND
3. AN ENTITY THAT PROVIDES TRANSIT SERVICE UNDER
A TRANSPORTATION COMPACT UNDER TITLE 10 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(3) “STATE PUBLIC TRANSIT SERVICE” MEANS ANY OF THE
FOLLOWING, IF OPERATED BY THE ADMINISTRATION OR ANOTHER STATE AGENCY:
(I) BUS SERVICE;
(II) TRAIN SERVICE;
(III) LIGHT RAIL SERVICE; AND
(IV) SUBWAY SERVICE.
(4) “STATE PUBLIC TRANSIT SERVICE STATION” MEANS A STOP OR
STATION FOR STATE PUBLIC TRANSIT SERVICE.
(B) (1) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, A A PERSON WHO
IS ALLEGED BY A PUBLIC TRANSIT OPERATOR TO HAVE COMMITTED AN ASSAULT OR
OTHER INTENTIONAL ACT CAUSING BODILY INJURY TO A PUBLIC TRANSIT
OPERATOR OR A PASSENGER WHILE THE PERSON IS ON BOARD A STATE PUBLIC
TRANSIT SERVICE OR AT A STATE PUBLIC TRANSIT SERVICE STATION MAY NOT
BOARD BE PROHIBITED FROM USING A STATE PUBLIC TRANSIT SERVICE OR ENTER
ENTERING A STATE PUBLIC TRANSIT SERVICE STATION FOR: STATION, UNDER
GUIDELINES AND SUBJECT TO AN APPEALS PROCESS ESTABLISHED BY THE
ADMINISTRATION.
(2) THIS SECTION DOES NOT INCREASE THE DUTY OF CARE FOR THE
ADMINISTRATION OR ANOTHER STATE AGENCY OR THEIR EMPLOYEES,
CONTRACTORS, OR CONTRACTOR’S EMPLOYEES FOR ANY TORT OR OTHER LIABILITY
PURPOSES IN CONNECTION WITH ACTIONS BY A PERSON ALLEGED TO HAVE
COMMITTED AN ASSAULT ON A PUBLIC TRANSIT OPERATOR OR PASSENGER.
(1) AT LEAST 30 DAYS, FOR A FIRST ACT OF ASSAULT OR
INTENTIONAL ACT CAUSING BODILY INJURY;
(2) AT LEAST 180 DAYS, FOR A SECOND ACT OF ASSAULT OR
INTENTIONAL ACT CAUSING BODILY INJURY; AND
(3) THE REMAINDER OF THE PERSON’S LIFE:
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 542
(I) FOR A THIRD ACT OF ASSAULT OR INTENTIONAL ACT
CAUSING BODILY INJURY; OR
(II) FOR ANY ACT OF ASSAULT OR INTENTIONAL ACT CAUSING
BODILY INJURY FOR WHICH THE PERSON USED A WEAPON.
(C) THE SECRETARY OR THE SECRETARY’S DESIGNEE MAY REDUCE OR
INCREASE THE PERIOD OF TIME THAT A PERSON WHO VIOLATES SUBSECTION (B) OF
THIS SECTION IS PROHIBITED FROM BOARDING A STATE PUBLIC TRANSIT SERVICE
OR ENTERING A STATE PUBLIC TRANSIT SERVICE STATION.
(D) (1) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES THIS SECTION IS SUBJECT TO
PROSECUTION FOR TRESPASSING.
(2) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION MAY BE CONSTRUED TO LIMIT OR
PROHIBIT THE ENFORCEMENT OF ANY OTHER STATE LAW.
(E) THE SECRETARY SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS
SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) On or before June 1, 2025, the Maryland Transit Administration, in
consultation with the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority, the Joint Safety
Committee, and operator union representatives, shall convene a workgroup to create a rider
code of conduct and implement a comprehensive internal safety program to strengthen
protections for Administration operators and passengers through clear safety protocols,
strengthened safety policies, and improved risk mitigation measures.
(b) The workgroup:
(1) shall address consequences for violations in Administration facilities
that shall include ridership bans for an assault on a public transit operator or passenger as
soon as practicable, the possibility of legal action, and an appeals process;
(2) may not require a criminal conviction as a prerequisite to a ban on
public transit service usage; and
(3) shall authorize, under standards set by the workgroup, the use of public
transit facilities by a person accused of assault on a public transit operator or passenger, if
the assault was directly related to the person’s disability and the person is accompanied by
a direct support professional or another appropriate caregiver when using public transit
facilities.
– 3 –

Ch. 542 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(c) On or before October 1, 2025, the workgroup shall report its findings and
recommendations to the Maryland Transit Administrator and, in accordance with § 2–1257
of the State Government Article, the Senate Finance Committee and the House
Environment and Transportation Committee.
(d) After issuing the report under subsection (c) of this section, the workgroup
shall continue to assess the effectiveness of the proposed code of conduct and internal safety
program and recommend ongoing improvements.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(1) if the Maryland Transit Administration adopts a rider code of conduct
and implements a comprehensive internal safety program, with no further action required
by the General Assembly, Section 1 of this Act shall be abrogated and of no further force
and effect; and
(2) the Maryland Transit Administration shall notify the Department of
Legislative Services within 5 days after adoption of the rider code of conduct and
implementation of a comprehensive internal safety program as described in Section 2 of
this Act.
SECTION 2. 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October June 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 13, 2025.
– 4 –